src/scripts/Czech/unicodechars.foma
#For lseq:
define UnicodeLseq 
%đ:[d ee p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ħ:[h aa p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ı:[ii b e z t e ts k y]|
%ĸ:[k r a]|
%ł:[e l p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ŋ:[e n g]|
%œ:[l i g a t u r a o e]|
%ŧ:[t ee p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ƀ:[b ee p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ɓ:[b ee s h aa k e m]|
%ƃ:[b ee s ts aa r o u s h o r a]|
%ƅ:[t oo n sh e s t]|
%ɔ:[o t e v rz e n ee oo]|
%ƈ:[c ee s h aa k e m]|
%ɖ:[a f r i c k ee d ee]|
%ɗ:[d ee s h aa k e m]|
%ƌ:[d ee s ts aa r o u s h o r a]|
%ƍ:[o t o ts e n aa d e l t a]|
%ǝ:[o b r aa c e n ee ee]|
%ə:[sh v a]|
%ɛ:[o t e v rz e n ee ee]|
%ɠ:[g ee s h aa k e m]|
%ɣ:[g a m a]|
%ƕ:[h aa v ee]|
%ɩ:[j o t a]|
%ɨ:[ii p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ƙ:[k aa s h aa k e m]|
%ƚ:[e l s ts aa r o u]|
%ƛ:[l a m b d a p rz e sh k iii r t n u t aa]|
%ɯ:[o b r aa c e n ee e m]|
%ɲ:[e n s h aa k e m z l e v a]|
%ƞ:[e n s d l o u h o u n o zh i ts k o u z p r a v a]|
%ɵ:[oo s v iii l n o v k o u u p r o s t rz e d]|
%ƣ:[o i]|
%ƥ:[p ee s h aa k e m]|
%ʀ:[y r]|
%ƨ:[t oo n d v a]|
%ʃ:[ee e s h aa]|
%ƪ:[o b r aa c e n ee ee e s h aa d o k o l a]|
%ƫ:[t ee s p rz e d nj ii m h aa k e m]|
%ƭ:[t ee s h aa k e m]|
%ʈ:[t ee s o h n u t yy m h aa k e m]|
%ʊ:[u p s i l o n]|
%ʋ:[v ee s h aa k e m]|
%ƴ:[y p s y l o n s h aa k e m]|
%ƶ:[z e t p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ʒ:[ee zh]|
%ƹ:[o b r aa c e n ee ee zh]|
%ƺ:[ee zh s o c aa s k e m]|
%ƻ:[d v a s p rz e sh k iii r t n u tj ii m]|
%ƽ:[t oo n p ije t]|
%ƾ:[o b r aa c e n yy f o n e t y c k yy r aa z s p rz e sh k iii r t n u tj ii m]|
%ǀ:[c v a k n u tj ii z u b y]|
%ǁ:[b o ts nj ii c v a k n u tj ii]|
%ǂ:[d aa s nj o v ee c v a k n u tj ii]|
%ǃ:[o h n u t ee c v a k n u tj ii]|
%ǥ:[g ee p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ȝ:[y o g h]|
%ȡ:[k u d iii r n a t ee d ee]|
%ȣ:[o u]|
%ȥ:[z e t s h aa k e m]|
%ȴ:[k u d iii r n a t ee e l]|
%ȵ:[k u d iii r n a t ee e n]|
%ȶ:[k u d iii r n a t ee t ee]|
%ȷ:[j ee b e z t e ts k y]|
%ȸ:[d ee b ee]|
%ȹ:[k v ee p ee]|
%ⱥ:[aa p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ȼ:[c ee p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ⱦ:[t ee p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee uu h l o p rz ii ts nj e]|
%ȿ:[e s s o z d o b n yy m o c aa s k e m]|
%ɀ:[z e t s o z d o b n yy m o c aa s k e m]|
%ɂ:[f o n e t y c k yy r aa z]|
%ʉ:[uu s ts aa r o u]|
%ʌ:[o b r aa c e n ee v ee]|
%ɇ:[ee p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ɉ:[j ee p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ɋ:[k v ee s o c aa s k e m v e t v a r u h aa k u]|
%ɍ:[e r p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ɏ:[y p s y l o n p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee]|
%ɐ:[o b r aa c e n ee aa]|
%ɑ:[a l f a]|
%ɒ:[o b r aa c e n aa a l f a]|
%ɕ:[k u d iii r n a t ee c ee]|
%ɘ:[o b r aa t e n ee ee]|
%ɚ:[sh v a s h aa k e m]|
%ɜ:[o b r aa c e n ee o t e v rz e n ee ee]|
%ɝ:[o b r aa c e n ee o t e v rz e n ee ee s h aa k e m]|
%ɞ:[z a v rz e n ee o b r aa c e n ee o t e v rz e n ee ee]|
%ɟ:[p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee j ee b e z t e ts k y]|
%ɡ:[s k r i p t g ee]|
%ɢ:[m a l ee v e l k ee g ee]|
%ɤ:[r a m s h o r n]|
%ɥ:[o b r aa c e n ee h aa]|
%ɦ:[h aa s h aa k e m]|
%ɧ:[h e n g s h aa k e m]|
%ɪ:[m a l ee v e l k ee ii]|
%ɫ:[e l s v iii l n o v k o u u p r o s t rz e d]|
%ɬ:[e l s p aa s k e m]|
%ɭ:[e l s o h n u t yy m h aa k e m]|
%ɮ:[l e z h]|
%ɰ:[o b r aa c e n ee e m s d l o u h o u n o zh i ts k o u]|
%ɱ:[e m s h aa k e m]|
%ɳ:[e n s o h n u t yy m h aa k e m]|
%ɴ:[m a l ee v e l k ee e n]|
%ɶ:[m a l ee v e l k ee o ee]|
%ɷ:[z a v rz e n aa o m e g a]|
%ɸ:[f ii]|
%ɹ:[o b r aa c e n ee e r]|
%ɺ:[o b r aa c e n ee e r s d l o u h o u n o zh i ts k o u]|
%ɻ:[o b r aa c e n ee e r s h aa k e m]|
%ɼ:[e r s d l o u h o u n o zh i ts k o u]|
%ɽ:[e r s o c aa s k e m]|
%ɾ:[e r s m a l yy m h aa k e m]|
%ɿ:[o b r aa c e n ee e r s m a l yy m h aa k e m]|
%ʁ:[m a l ee o b r aa c e n ee v e l k ee e r]|
%ʂ:[e s s s h aa k e m]|
%ʄ:[p rz e sh k iii r t n u t ee j ee b e z t e ts k y s h aa k e m]|
%ʅ:[s k iii r ts e n ee o b r aa c e n ee e z h]|
%ʆ:[k u d iii r n a t ee e z h]|
%ʇ:[o b r aa c e n ee t ee]|
%ʍ:[o b r aa c e n ee d v o j i t ee v ee]|
%ʎ:[o b r aa c e n ee y p s y l o n]|
%ʏ:[m a l ee v e l k ee y p s y l oo n]|
%ʐ:[z e t s o h n u t yy m h aa k e m]|
%ʑ:[k u d iii r n a t ee z e t]|
%ʓ:[k u d iii r n a t ee e z h]|
%ʔ:[f o n e t y c k yy r aa z]|
%ʕ:[z nj e l aa h iii r d e l nj ii f r i k a tj i v a]|
%ʖ:[o b r aa c e n yy f o n e t y c k yy r aa z]|
%ʗ:[r o z t a zh e n ee c ee]|
%ʘ:[c v a k n u tj ii r t y]|
%ʙ:[m a l ee v e l k ee b ee]|
%ʚ:[z a v rz e n ee o t e v rz e n ee ee]|
%ʛ:[m a l ee v e l k ee g ee s h aa k e m]|
%ʜ:[m a l ee v e l k ee h aa]|
%ʝ:[j ee s e s k rz ii zh e n yy m o c aa s k e m]|
%ʞ:[o b r aa c e n ee k aa]|
%ʟ:[m a l ee v e l k ee e l]|
%ʠ:[k v ee s h aa k e m]|
%ʡ:[p rz e sh k iii r t n u t yy f o n e t y c k yy r aa z]|
%ʢ:[o b r aa c e n yy p rz e sh k iii r t n u t yy f o n e t y c k yy r aa z]|
%ʣ:[d v o j h l aa s k a d ee z e t]|
%ʤ:[d v o j h l aa s k a d e s h]|
%ʥ:[k u d iii r n a t aa d v o j h l aa s k a d ee z e t]|
%ʦ:[d v o j h l aa s k a t ee e s]|
%ʧ:[d v o j h l aa s k a t e s h]|
%ʨ:[k u d iii r n a t aa d v o j h l aa s k a t ee c ee]|
%ʩ:[d v o j h l aa s k a f e n g]|
%ʪ:[d v o j h l aa s k a e l e s]|
%ʫ:[d v o j h l aa s k a e l z e t]|
%ʬ:[r e t nj ii n aa r a z]|
%ʭ:[z u b nj ii n aa r a z]|
%ʮ:[o b r aa c e n ee h aa s m a l yy m h aa k e m]|
%ʯ:[o b r aa c e n ee h aa s m a l yy m h aa k e m a o c aa s k e m];


#For downcase:
define UnicodeDowncase 
%Đ -> %đ || _ ,,
%Ħ -> %ħ || _ ,,
%ĸ -> %ĸ || _ ,,
%Ł -> %ł || _ ,,
%Ŋ -> %ŋ || _ ,,
%Œ -> %œ || _ ,,
%Ŧ -> %ŧ || _ ,,
%Ƀ -> %ƀ || _ ,,
%Ɓ -> %ɓ || _ ,,
%Ƃ -> %ƃ || _ ,,
%Ƅ -> %ƅ || _ ,,
%Ɔ -> %ɔ || _ ,,
%Ƈ -> %ƈ || _ ,,
%Ɖ -> %ɖ || _ ,,
%Ɗ -> %ɗ || _ ,,
%Ƌ -> %ƌ || _ ,,
%ƍ -> %ƍ || _ ,,
%Ǝ -> %ǝ || _ ,,
%Ə -> %ə || _ ,,
%Ɛ -> %ɛ || _ ,,
%Ɠ -> %ɠ || _ ,,
%Ɣ -> %ɣ || _ ,,
%Ƕ -> %ƕ || _ ,,
%Ɩ -> %ɩ || _ ,,
%Ɨ -> %ɨ || _ ,,
%Ƙ -> %ƙ || _ ,,
%Ƚ -> %ƚ || _ ,,
%ƛ -> %ƛ || _ ,,
%Ɯ -> %ɯ || _ ,,
%Ɲ -> %ɲ || _ ,,
%Ƞ -> %ƞ || _ ,,
%Ɵ -> %ɵ || _ ,,
%Ƣ -> %ƣ || _ ,,
%Ƥ -> %ƥ || _ ,,
%Ʀ -> %ʀ || _ ,,
%Ƨ -> %ƨ || _ ,,
%Ʃ -> %ʃ || _ ,,
%ƪ -> %ƪ || _ ,,
%ƫ -> %ƫ || _ ,,
%Ƭ -> %ƭ || _ ,,
%Ʈ -> %ʈ || _ ,,
%Ʊ -> %ʊ || _ ,,
%Ʋ -> %ʋ || _ ,,
%Ƴ -> %ƴ || _ ,,
%Ƶ -> %ƶ || _ ,,
%Ʒ -> %ʒ || _ ,,
%Ƹ -> %ƹ || _ ,,
%ƺ -> %ƺ || _ ,,
%ƻ -> %ƻ || _ ,,
%Ƽ -> %ƽ || _ ,,
%ƾ -> %ƾ || _ ,,
%ǀ -> %ǀ || _ ,,
%ǁ -> %ǁ || _ ,,
%ǂ -> %ǂ || _ ,,
%ǃ -> %ǃ || _ ,,
%Ǥ -> %ǥ || _ ,,
%Ȝ -> %ȝ || _ ,,
%ȡ -> %ȡ || _ ,,
%Ȣ -> %ȣ || _ ,,
%Ȥ -> %ȥ || _ ,,
%ȴ -> %ȴ || _ ,,
%ȵ -> %ȵ || _ ,,
%ȶ -> %ȶ || _ ,,
%ȷ -> %ȷ || _ ,,
%ȸ -> %ȸ || _ ,,
%ȹ -> %ȹ || _ ,,
%Ⱥ -> %ⱥ || _ ,,
%Ȼ -> %ȼ || _ ,,
%Ⱦ -> %ⱦ || _ ,,
%Ȿ -> %ȿ || _ ,,
%Ɀ -> %ɀ || _ ,,
%Ɂ -> %ɂ || _ ,,
%Ʉ -> %ʉ || _ ,,
%Ʌ -> %ʌ || _ ,,
%Ɇ -> %ɇ || _ ,,
%Ɉ -> %ɉ || _ ,,
%Ɋ -> %ɋ || _ ,,
%Ɍ -> %ɍ || _ ,,
%Ɏ -> %ɏ || _ ,,
%Ɐ -> %ɐ || _ ,,
%Ɑ -> %ɑ || _ ,,
%Ɒ -> %ɒ || _ ,,
%ɕ -> %ɕ || _ ,,
%ɘ -> %ɘ || _ ,,
%ɚ -> %ɚ || _ ,,
%Ɜ -> %ɜ || _ ,,
%ɝ -> %ɝ || _ ,,
%ɞ -> %ɞ || _ ,,
%ɟ -> %ɟ || _ ,,
%Ɡ -> %ɡ || _ ,,
%ɢ -> %ɢ || _ ,,
%ɤ -> %ɤ || _ ,,
%Ɥ -> %ɥ || _ ,,
%Ɦ -> %ɦ || _ ,,
%ɧ -> %ɧ || _ ,,
%Ɪ -> %ɪ || _ ,,
%Ɫ -> %ɫ || _ ,,
%Ɬ -> %ɬ || _ ,,
%ɭ -> %ɭ || _ ,,
%ɮ -> %ɮ || _ ,,
%ɰ -> %ɰ || _ ,,
%Ɱ -> %ɱ || _ ,,
%ɳ -> %ɳ || _ ,,
%ɴ -> %ɴ || _ ,,
%ɶ -> %ɶ || _ ,,
%ɷ -> %ɷ || _ ,,
%ɸ -> %ɸ || _ ,,
%ɹ -> %ɹ || _ ,,
%ɺ -> %ɺ || _ ,,
%ɻ -> %ɻ || _ ,,
%ɼ -> %ɼ || _ ,,
%Ɽ -> %ɽ || _ ,,
%ɾ -> %ɾ || _ ,,
%ɿ -> %ɿ || _ ,,
%ʁ -> %ʁ || _ ,,
%Ʂ -> %ʂ || _ ,,
%ʄ -> %ʄ || _ ,,
%ʅ -> %ʅ || _ ,,
%ʆ -> %ʆ || _ ,,
%Ʇ -> %ʇ || _ ,,
%ʍ -> %ʍ || _ ,,
%ʎ -> %ʎ || _ ,,
%ʏ -> %ʏ || _ ,,
%ʐ -> %ʐ || _ ,,
%ʑ -> %ʑ || _ ,,
%ʓ -> %ʓ || _ ,,
%ʔ -> %ʔ || _ ,,
%ʕ -> %ʕ || _ ,,
%ʖ -> %ʖ || _ ,,
%ʗ -> %ʗ || _ ,,
%ʘ -> %ʘ || _ ,,
%ʙ -> %ʙ || _ ,,
%ʚ -> %ʚ || _ ,,
%ʛ -> %ʛ || _ ,,
%ʜ -> %ʜ || _ ,,
%Ʝ -> %ʝ || _ ,,
%Ʞ -> %ʞ || _ ,,
%ʟ -> %ʟ || _ ,,
%ʠ -> %ʠ || _ ,,
%ʡ -> %ʡ || _ ,,
%ʢ -> %ʢ || _ ,,
%ʣ -> %ʣ || _ ,,
%ʤ -> %ʤ || _ ,,
%ʥ -> %ʥ || _ ,,
%ʦ -> %ʦ || _ ,,
%ʧ -> %ʧ || _ ,,
%ʨ -> %ʨ || _ ,,
%ʩ -> %ʩ || _ ,,
%ʪ -> %ʪ || _ ,,
%ʫ -> %ʫ || _ ,,
%ʬ -> %ʬ || _ ,,
%ʭ -> %ʭ || _ ,,
%ʮ -> %ʮ || _ ,,
%ʯ -> %ʯ || _ ;
